Illinois, session 104th, SB3757.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Interscholastic Athletic Organization Act 5is amended by adding Section 1.22 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 25/1.22 new)7    Sec. 1.22. Safe Sports School Seal. 8    (a) As used in this Section:9    "Chronic traumatic encephalopathy" or "CTE" means a 10disease that has degenerative effects on the brains of people 11who have experienced head trauma either once or multiple times 12and causes many symptoms in people experiencing CTE, 13including, but not limited to, memory loss, impulsive 14behavior, emotional instability, and trouble with common motor 15functions.16    "School" means a public or nonpublic elementary or 17secondary school in this State or a public or nonpublic 18institution of higher education in this State. 19    (b) The Illinois High School Association and the State 20Board of Education, in consultation with the Department of 21Public Health, the Illinois Athletic Trainers Association, and 22the National Institutes of Health, may develop and implement 23eligibility standards for schools to obtain a Safe Sports   SB3757- 2 -LRB104 20537 LNS 34014 b1School Seal. Standards for eligible schools to receive the 2Safe Sports School Seal shall require a school to, without 3limitation:4        (1) include concussion awareness in parent and student 5    handbooks;6        (2) provide annual coach and staff training on chronic 7    traumatic encephalopathy and concussions;8        (3) maintain return-to-learn and return-to-play 9    protocols for students and student athletes who have been 10    diagnosed with a concussion; and11        (4) host at least one community awareness event each 12    year on CTE and concussions.13    (c) The Safe Sports School Seal shall be given to eligible 14schools by the Illinois High School Association. In order to 15receive the Safe Sports School Seal, a school shall send an 16application created by the Illinois High School Association to 17the Illinois High School Association that contains evidence 18that the school has satisfied all of the requirements under 19this Section.20    (d) The State Board of Education may adopt rules as 21necessary to implement this Section. 22    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 232026.